Georgia, session 2025_26, HB514.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
An Act providing a new charter for the City of Kennesaw, approved May 6, 2013
(Ga. L. 2013, p. 4234), as amended, is amended in subsection (c) of Section 1.02 by adding
a new paragraph to read as follows:
"(7) The corporate limits of the City of Kennesaw shall also include the following
described parcels of land:
Tract 1:
ALL THAT TRACT OR PARCEL OF LAND LYING AND BEING IN LAND LOT
208 OF THE 20TH DISTRICT 2ND SECTION, COBB COUNTY, GEORGIA, AND
BEING MORE PARTICULARLY DESCRIBED AS FOLLOWS:
H. B. 514
- 1 -

LC 47 3338/AP
BEGINNING AT A NAIL SET AT THE MITTERED INTERSECTION OF THE
SOUTHEASTERLY RIGHT OF WAY OF ERNEST BARRETT PARKWAY
(VARIABLE R/W) AND THE SOUTHWESTERLY RIGHT OF WAY OF U S. HWY
41 (A.K.A. N COBB PARKWAY) (200' R/W), SAID POINT BEING THE POINT OF
BEGINNING;
THENCE ALONG THE SAID RIGHT OF WAY OF U.S. HWY 41 SOUTH 45
DEGREES 37 MINUTES 09 SECONDS EAST 48.42 FEET TO A POINT;
THENCE LEAVING SAID RIGHT OF WAY SOUTH 01 DEGREES 10 MINUTES
03 SECONDS WEST 335.29 FEET TO A BENT #4 REBAR FOUND ON THE
COMMON LINE OF LAND LOTS 208 AND 211;
THENCE ALONG SAID LAND LOT LINE NORTH 89 DEGREES 01 MINUTES 43
SECONDS WEST 434.75 FEET TO A CONCRETE MONUMENT FOUND ON THE
SOUTHEASTERLY RIGHT OF WAY OF ERNEST BARRETT PARKWAY
(VARIABLE R/W);
THENCE ALONG SAID RIGHT OF WAY NORTH 45 DEGREES 35 MINUTES 24
SECONDS EAST 117.25 FEET TO A CONCRETE MONUMENT FOUND;
THENCE ALONG A CURVE TO THE RIGHT AN ARC LENGTH OF 79.14 FEET,
SAID CURVE HAVING A RADIUS OF 7569.53 FEET, AND BEING SUBTENDED
BY A CHORD OF 79.14 FEET, AT NORTH 41 DEGREES 20 MINUTES 32
SECONDS EAST TO A #4 REBAR SET;
THENCE SOUTH 48 DEGREES 05 MINUTES 49 SECONDS EAST 7.00 FEET TO
A CONCRETE MONUMENT FOUND;
THENCE ALONG A CURVE TO THE RIGHT AN ARC LENGTH OF 54.45 FEET,
SAID CURVE HAVING A RADIUS OF 7562.53 FEET, AND BEING SUBTENDED
BY A CHORD OF 54.45 FEET, AT NORTH 42 DEGREES 06 MINUTES 34
SECONDS EAST TO A REBAR SET;
H. B. 514
- 2 -

LC 47 3338/AP
THENCE SOUTH 47 DEGREES 41 MINUTES 04 SECONDS EAST 3.00 FEET TO
A #4 REBAR SET;
THENCE ALONG A CURVE TO THE RIGHT AN ARC LENGTH OF 138.67 FEET,
SAID CURVE HAVING A RADIUS OF 7559.53 FEET, AND BEING SUBTENDED
BY A CHORD OF 138.67 FEET, AT NORTH 42 DEGREES 50 MINUTES 29
SECONDS EAST TO A CONCRETE MONUMENT FOUND;
THENCE NORTH 46 DEGREES 48 MINUTES 12 SECONDS WEST 10.08 FEET
TO A CONCRETE MONUMENT FOUND;
THENCE ALONG A CURVE TO THE RIGHT AN ARC LENGTH OF 28.22 FEET,
SAID CURVE HAVING A RADIUS OF 1839.94 FEET, AND BEING SUBTENDED
BY A CHORD OF 28.22 FEET, AT NORTH 43 DEGREES 27 MINUTES 36
SECONDS EAST TO A CONCRETE MONUMENT FOUND;
THENCE WITH A COMPOUND CURVE TO THE RIGHT AN ARC LENGTH OF
87.12 FEET, SAID CURVE HAVING A RADIUS OF 1839.94 FEET, AND BEING
SUBTENDED BY A CHORD OF 87.11 FEET, AT NORTH 44 DEGREES 56
MINUTES 10 SECONDS EAST TO A #4 REBAR SET;
THENCE SOUTH 85 DEGREES 57 MINUTES 25 SECONDS EAST 59.21 FEET TO
A NAIL SET, SAID POINT BEING THE POINT OF BEGINNING;
SAID TRACT OR PARCEL CONTAINS 2.20 ACRES (95,692 SQUARE FEET),
MORE OR LESS."
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 514
- 3 -